fi: Maalin koko: Täysikokoinen (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pieni pop-up (4 x 3 ft); Kohdemaali (4 x 2 ft); Nuorten (12 x 6 ft); Muu
de: Torgröße: Standardgröße (24 x 8 Fuß); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 Fuß); Pop-up klein (4 x 3 Fuß); Ziel (4 x 2 Fuß); Jugend (12 x 6 Fuß); Andere
vi: Kích thước khung thành: Cỡ đầy đủ (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Tự bung cỡ nhỏ (4 x 3 ft); Mục tiêu (4 x 2 ft); Thiếu niên (12 x 6 ft); Khác
fr: Taille du but: Taille réglementaire (24 x 8 pi); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 pi); Pop-up petit (4 x 3 pi); Cible (4 x 2 pi); Junior (12 x 6 pi); Autre
hr-HR: Veličina gola: Puna veličina (24 x 8 stopa); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 stope); Mali pop-up (4 x 3 stope); Za gađanje (4 x 2 stope); Za mlade (12 x 6 stopa); Ostalo
pt-BR: Tamanho do gol: Tamanho oficial (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pop-up pequena (4 x 3 ft); Alvo (4 x 2 ft); Juvenil (12 x 6 ft); Outro
hu: A kapu mérete: Teljes méret (24 x 8 láb); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 láb); Kicsi pop-up (4 x 3 láb); Célkapu (4 x 2 láb); Ifjúsági (12 x 6 láb); Egyéb
ru: Размер ворот: Полноразмерные (24 x 8 футов); Для футзала (3 x 2 м); Мини (6 x 4 фута); Складные малые (4 x 3 фута); Целевые (4 x 2 фута); Подростковые (12 x 6 футов); Другое
ko: 골대 크기: 풀사이즈(24 x 8ft); 풋살(3 x 2m); 미니(6 x 4ft); 팝업 소형(4 x 3ft); 타겟(4 x 2ft); 유스(12 x 6ft); 기타
sv: Målstorlek: Full storlek (24 x 8 fot); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 fot); Popup liten (4 x 3 fot); Mål (4 x 2 fot); Junior (12 x 6 fot); Annan
nl: Doel maat: Volledige grootte (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pop-up klein (4 x 3 ft); Target (4 x 2 ft); Jeugd (12 x 6 ft); Anders
bg-BG: Размер на вратата: Пълен размер (24 x 8 фута); Футзал (3 x 2 м); Мини (6 x 4 фута); Малка сгъваема (4 x 3 фута); За мишена (4 x 2 фута); Младежка (12 x 6 фута); Друго
sk-SK: Veľkosť cieľa: Plná veľkosť (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Malá rozkladacia (4 x 3 ft); Cieľová (4 x 2 ft); Mládežnícka (12 x 6 ft); Iné
pl: Rozmiar bramki: Pełnowymiarowa (24 x 8 ft); Futsalowa (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Mała typu pop-up (4 x 3 ft); Do strzałów do celu (4 x 2 ft); Młodzieżowa (12 x 6 ft); Inny
es: Tamaño del arco: Tamaño completo (24 x 8 ft); Fútbol sala (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Plegable pequeño (4 x 3 ft); Objetivo (4 x 2 ft); Juvenil (12 x 6 ft); Otro
cs: Velikost gólu: Plná velikost (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Skládací malá (4 x 3 ft); Cílová (4 x 2 ft); Mládežnická (12 x 6 ft); Ostatní
it: Misura della porta: Regolamentare (24 x 8 ft); Calcio a 5 (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pop-up piccola (4 x 3 ft); Obiettivo (4 x 2 ft); Ragazzi (12 x 6 ft); Altro
da: Målstørrelse: Fuld størrelse (24 x 8 fod); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 fod); Pop op, lille (4 x 3 fod); Mål (4 x 2 fod); Junior (12 x 6 fod); Anden
zh-TW: 球門尺寸: 標準尺寸 (24 x 8 呎); 五人制足球 (3 x 2 公尺); 迷你 (6 x 4 呎); 小型快收 (4 x 3 呎); 標靶 (4 x 2 呎); 青少年 (12 x 6 呎); 其他
nb: Målstørrelse: Full størrelse (24 x 8 fot); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 fot); Pop-up liten (4 x 3 fot); Mål (4 x 2 fot); Ungdom (12 x 6 fot); Annet
tr: Kale boyutu: Tam boyutlu (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Küçük açılır (4 x 3 ft); Hedef (4 x 2 ft); Genç (12 x 6 ft); Diğer
ja: ゴールサイズ: フルサイズ (24 x 8フィート); フットサル (3 x 2 m); ミニ (6 x 4フィート); ポップアップスモール (4 x 3フィート); ターゲット (4 x 2フィート); ユース (12 x 6フィート); その他
sl-SI: Velikost gola: Polna velikost (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Majhen, samopostavljiv (4 x 3 ft); Cilj (4 x 2 ft); Za mlade (12 x 6 ft); Drugo
en: Goal size: Full size (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pop-up small (4 x 3 ft); Target (4 x 2 ft); Youth (12 x 6 ft); Other
pt-PT: Objetivo: Tamanho normal (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pop-up pequeno (4 x 3 ft); Alvo (4 x 2 ft); Juvenil (12 x 6 ft); Outro
el: Μέγεθος τέρματος: Κανονικό μέγεθος (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Μικρό pop-up (4 x 3 ft); Στόχος (4 x 2 ft); Εφηβικό (12 x 6 ft); Άλλο
zh-CN: 球门尺寸: 全尺寸（24 x 8 英尺）; 五人制足球（3 x 2 米）; 迷你（6 x 4 英尺）; 弹出式小号（4 x 3 英尺）; 靶子（4 x 2 英尺）; 青少年（12 x 6 英尺）; 其他
ro-RO: Dimensiunea porții: Dimensiune standard (24 x 8 ft); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 ft); Pop-up mic (4 x 3 ft); Țintă (4 x 2 ft); Tineret (12 x 6 ft); Altele
th: ขนาดประตูฟุตบอล: ขนาดมาตรฐาน (24 x 8 ฟุต); ฟุตซอล (3 x 2 ม.); มินิ (6 x 4 ฟุต); ป๊อปอัพขนาดเล็ก (4 x 3 ฟุต); เป้าหมาย (4 x 2 ฟุต); เยาวชน (12 x 6 ฟุต); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Vartų dydis: Standartinis dydis (24 x 8 pėd.); Futsal (3 x 2 m); Mini (6 x 4 pėd.); Surenkami maži (4 x 3 pėd.); Taikinys (4 x 2 pėd.); Jaunuolių (12 x 6 pėd.); Kita